Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2669.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Job Automation Disclosure Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." The following:(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(i) Perceive real and virtual environments.123456789101112131415161718 (ii) Abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into models through analysis in an automated manner.(iii) Use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employ." To engage, suffer or permit to work. A worker is considered an employee and not an independent contractor unless all three of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The worker is free from the control and direction of the employer in connection with the performance of the work.(2) The worker performs work that is outside the usual course of the employer's business.(3) The worker is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation or business of the same nature as that involved in the work performed."Employee." An individual employed by an employer."Employer." The Commonwealth, its political subdivisions and their instrumentalities or any person, association, entity, organization, partnership, business trust, limited liability company or corporation who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises any control over the wages, hours or working conditions of any employee."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of artificial intelligence models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content.20260HB2669PN3704 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Synthetic content." Information such as images, videos, audio clips or text that have been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence.Section 3. Disclosure requirement.An employer that serves written notice on the department under 29 U.S.C. § 2102(a) (relating to notice required before plant closings and mass layoffs) shall disclose to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, whether the layoffs that are the subject of the written notice are related to the employer's use of artificial intelligence or another technological change.Section 4. Enforcement.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall enforce this act.(b) Penalties.--An employer that violates this act may be subject to:(1) For employers employing no more than 200 employees, a civil penalty of at least $500 but not more than $1,000 per day of violation.(2) For employers employing more than 200 employees, a civil penalty of at least $1,000 but not more than $5,000 per day of violation.Section 5. Exemptions.This act shall not apply to seasonal employees or temporary employees.Section 6. Rules and regulations.The department shall adopt rules or promulgate regulations or guidance necessary to carry out the provisions of this act within six months of the effective date of this section.Section 7. Effective date.20260HB2669PN3704 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2669PN3704 - 4 - 1